Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska77-2704.22
Manufacturing machinery and equipment and related services; exemption.

(1) Sales and use taxes shall not be imposed on the gross receipts from the sale, lease, or rental and on the storage, use, or other consumption in this state of manufacturing machinery and equipment.

(2) Sales and use taxes shall not be imposed on the gross receipts from the sale of installation, repair, and maintenance services performed on or with respect to manufacturing machinery and equipment.

Laws 2005, LB 312, § 10.

Under section 77-2701.47 and subsection (1) of this section, the sale of manufacturing machinery and equipment includes the sale of items that are assembled to make manufacturing machinery and equipment. Concrete Indus. v. Nebraska Dept. of Rev., 277 Neb. 897, 766 N.W.2d 103 (2009).